Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 9 Retirement System — Membership and Service Credits

36-9-1.
Earliest date of commencement of membership.

Membership in the retirement system shall begin not earlier than the first day of July, 1936, and shall consist of the persons described in §§

36-9-2

and

36-9-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; P.L. 1949, ch. 2286, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-1

.

36-9-2.
Membership of persons employed after establishment of system.

All employees as defined in chapter 8 of this title who became employees on or after July 1, 1936, shall, under contract of their employment become members of the retirement system and shall receive no pension or retirement allowance from any other pension or retirement system supported wholly or in part by the state of Rhode Island, except as provided in chapter 10.3 of title 36 and §

36-9-3

, nor shall they be required to make contributions under any other pension or retirement system of the state except as provided in chapter 10.3 of title 36, anything to the contrary notwithstanding; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to those employees who may be required or elect to participate in a retirement program existing by virtue of chapter 17.1 of title 16 or §

36-10-9.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; P.L. 1949, ch. 2286, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-2

; P.L. 1967, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1978, ch. 384, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 329, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-2.1.
Membership in other retirement systems.

An employee who is a member of the retirement system may be a member of the retirement system of any union provided the union retirement plan is covered by the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974 (ERISA) [29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.] and is tax qualified pursuant to the internal revenue service, and remain eligible to participate and receive benefits as provided in chapters 8 through 10 of this title.

Participants in a union retirement system shall not receive a greater wage or benefit increase then that granted other state employees covered by a collective bargaining clause.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 199, § 1.

36-9-3.
Retired members of the state police — Eligibility.

Whenever any retired member of the Rhode Island state police shall be an employee of the state or any of its agencies, commissions, or bureaus in any capacity, other than as a member of the state police, as defined in chapter 8 of this title, that employee shall be eligible to participate and receive benefits as provided in chapters 8 — 10 of this title; provided, however, that in no event shall any retired member collect a state police pension while in the employ of the state as provided herein, nor shall any years of service for which the member is eligible for a state police pension be included in or added to the members’ credits for eligibility or for benefits under chapters 8 to 10 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 101, § 2.

36-9-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

This section and former §

36-9-3

(P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1045, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; P.L. 1949, ch. 2286, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

36-9-3

,

36-9-4

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 1.

36-9-5.
Officers and employees exempt — Former court judges and clerks.

The members of the general assembly and the general officers of the state, except to the extent herein provided, the judges of the supreme, superior, family, district courts, the traffic tribunal, judges of the workers’ compensation court except to the extent herein provided, school teachers as defined by §

16-16-1

except to the extent provided by chapter 17 of title 16, and members of the Rhode Island state police shall be exempt from the provisions of chapters 8 — 10 of this title; provided, however, that any justice or associate justice or judge of the supreme court, superior court, family court, district court, or traffic tribunal, chairperson of the workers’ compensation court, or judge of the workers’ compensation court who was a member of the retirement system prior to becoming a justice or associate justice or judge, shall, upon his or her filing with the retirement board a written waiver of all benefits under the provisions of §§

8-3-7

—

8-3-11

or

28-30-15

—

28-30-18

be permitted to elect to remain a member of the retirement system by paying into the retirement system such sums as provided in §

36-10-1

computed on his or her salary as a justice, associate justice, or judge and shall be eligible for all benefits under this title.

Any justice, associate justice, or judge who shall have retired in accordance with the provisions of this section and who shall be recalled to service shall be recalled in accordance with the provisions of §

8-3-7(c)

, §

28-30-15(b)

, or §

28-30-16

, or §

28-30-16.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 14; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 14; P.L. 1941, ch. 1048, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1948, ch. 2102, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-5

; P.L. 1973, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 256, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 458, § 3; P.L. 1988, ch. 616, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 334, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 402, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-6.
Election by elected officers or legislative employees to become members.

Notwithstanding the fact that their business time may not be devoted exclusively to the services of the state, any member of the general assembly or any of the general officers of the state, may elect to participate in the benefits provided by chapters 8 — 10 of this title by filing an application with the board on or before December 31, 1948, or within six (6) months from the date upon which that person first qualifies for that office, whichever is later. Notwithstanding any other provision of chapters 8 — 10 of this title, upon becoming a member of the system that person shall be entitled to prior service credit covering service rendered prior to the date of becoming a member of the system for service rendered to the state as a state employee, a member of the general assembly, or as a general officer.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; P.L. 1948, ch. 2050, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-6

; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 2.

36-9-7 — 36-9-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; P.L. 1949, ch. 2286, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2621, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

36-9-7

, 36-9-8, 36-9-9; P.L. 1965, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 133, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 3, effective January 1, 1993.

36-9-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3812, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-10

); Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 2.

36-9-11.
Retroactive membership of elected legislator.

Any duly elected member of the general assembly who has previously rendered service as a member of the general assembly and who for any reason did not become a member of the state retirement system at the beginning of his or her service to the state as a member of the general assembly or who has otherwise failed to apply for credit for that legislative service may elect to have his or her period of membership made retroactive to the date when he or she was sworn in as a member of the general assembly irrespective of his or her age on that date; provided, that the elected member of the general assembly makes application to the board, and pays into the retirement system, in such manner as the board should by regulation provide, the contributions he or she would have paid into the system had he or she become a member immediately on the date of his or her being sworn in as a member of the general assembly, plus regular interest to date of payment.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1951, ch. 2856, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2903, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-11

; P.L. 1960, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1965, ch. 56, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 133, § 1.

36-9-12 — 36-9-19.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 8; P.L. 1948, ch. 2128, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2446, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3440, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3617, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3618, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3676, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3693, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3736, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

36-9-12

— 36-9-19; P.L. 1970, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 273, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 289, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 1; and P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 3.

36-9-20.
Credit for service as a teacher, municipal employee, or legislator.

Any state employee who shall have rendered service as a teacher as defined under the provisions of chapters 16 and 17 of title 16 shall be entitled to credit for that service for the various purposes of this system, provided the member shall have been a contributing member of this system for that period. Any state employee who shall have been a contributing member of the municipal system as defined under the provisions of chapter 21 of title 45 shall be given credit for that service for the various purposes of this system, provided the member’s contributions are transferred to this system. All contributions made by the member shall be transferred in toto to this system for the periods of service and the retirement system shall calculate the full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer. If the full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer is greater than the total employee contributions transferred, the retirement system shall also transfer the difference between the full actuarial value of the accrued benefit with the former employer and the employee’s contributions from the account of the former employer to the account of the current employer. In any case in which a member shall have received a refund or refunds of contributions made to the system, the allowance of the aforesaid credit for service shall be conditioned upon the payment of the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

. Any service as defined herein for which no contributions were made may be granted provided the member pays to the retirement system the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

. Any state employee or teacher as defined under the provisions of chapters 16 and 17 of title 16 who shall have been employed by a municipality that did not elect to accept chapter 21 of title 45 as provided in §

45-21-4

shall be given credit for that service for the various purposes of this system, provided that the employee shall have met the definitional requirements of “employee” as stated in §

45-21-2(7)

and provided the member pays to the retirement system an amount equal to the full actuarial value of the credit as certified by the retirement board; provided, however, that any state employee who shall have been employed by a municipality that did not elect to accept chapter 21 of title 45 as provided in §

45-21-4

shall be given credit for that service for the various purposes of this system, to a maximum period of four (4) years, provided the member pays to the retirement system the full actuarial cost as defined in § 36-8-1(10). Nothing in this section shall be deemed to allow the purchase of four (4) years of service for credit in more than one retirement system.

Any member who shall have rendered service both as a state employee under §

36-10-9

, and service under §

36-10-9

.2(a), shall be eligible to elect to combine the member’s service under §

36-10-9.2(a)

and service under § 36-10-9 to determine the member’s retirement eligibility date under § 36-10-9. For any member making this election, the member will receive a single benefit equal to the accrued benefit computed under §

36-10-10.2

, plus the accrued benefit computed under §

36-10-10

.

The retirement board shall fix and determine rules and regulations to govern the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 8; P.L. 1951, ch. 2830, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-20

; P.L. 1970, ch. 112, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 1975, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 207, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 211, § 4; P.L. 1984, ch. 304, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 431, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 469, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 471, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 142, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 70, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 291, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6; P.L. 2019, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 233, § 1.

36-9-20.1 — 36-9-20.4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 551, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 560, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1990, ch. 373, § 2 and P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 3.

36-9-20.5.
Purchase of service credit — Inactive status.

Notwithstanding any general or public law to the contrary, any state employee or teacher participating in the employees’ retirement system who is on workers’ compensation may purchase up to four (4) years of service credit for time currently permitted to be purchased under law without the necessity of returning to active status as an employee. The member shall pay to the system the full actuarial cost as defined in subsection

36-8-1(9)

, except as provided in §

36-9-31

for military service credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 409, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 352, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 2.

36-9-21.
Service information submitted by department heads.

It shall be the duty of the head of each department and agency to furnish at the times and in the manner that the retirement board and/or the retirement system may direct, information concerning the name, title, compensation, duties, date of birth, and length of service of each member employed, and any other information which the retirement board or retirement system considers necessary for the proper execution of this chapter, and to give prompt notice of all appointments, removals, deaths, resignations, leaves of absence and changes in pay of members.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-21

; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-22.
Cessation of membership.

If any member becomes a beneficiary, dies, or receives a refund of contributions, he or she shall thereupon cease to be a member, subject, however, to the provisions of §

36-10-8

in regard to reinstatement of membership in the case of a member who has received a refund and who has subsequently reentered the service of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-22

.

36-9-23.
Inactive membership.

If a member leaves the service of the state but does not receive a refund of his or her contributions, his or her membership in the system shall continue but his or her status shall be that of an inactive member. In no event shall an inactive member be entitled to an annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance under chapters 8 — 10 of this title other than a refund of his or her contributions as provided in §

36-10-8

or except as provided in §

36-10-11

unless he or she shall reenter the service and be in the service of the state at the time he or she claims to be entitled to any annuity, benefit, or retirement allowance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 7; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-23

.

36-9-24.
Part-time school lunch employees.

Whenever any state school lunch employee, who is a member of the system as a full-time employee is involuntarily transferred to a position of less than twenty (20) hours per week, the employee shall remain a contributing member of the retirement system and receive full credit for that part-time service, provided the service shall be at least fifteen (15) hours per week.

Whenever a school lunch employee previously ineligible for membership in the system because of employment less than twenty (20) hours per week, subsequently becomes eligible for membership but who has since attained the age of sixty (60) years, the employee shall have the option to join the system at the time of the subsequent eligible employment status.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 211, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 547, § 1.

36-9-25.
Standard for year’s service credits.

The retirement board shall fix and determine, by appropriate rules and regulations, how much service in any year is equivalent to a year of service, but in computing that service or in computing the compensation it shall credit no period of more than a month’s duration during which a member was absent without pay nor shall more than one year of service be credited on account of all service in one calendar year.

Notwithstanding any other section of law, no member of the retirement system shall be permitted to purchase service credit for any portion of a year for which he or she is already receiving service credit in this retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-25

; P.L. 1959, ch. 105, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 29, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 2.

36-9-25.1.
Leave service credits.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the retirement law or rulings of the retirement board in accordance with the powers vested therein, state employees with at least one year of service who have been granted by their appointing authority a leave of absence without pay to further their education in the field of their state employment, shall be entitled to credit as service for the various purposes of their retirement system, provided the person, upon completion of his or her educational leave, returns to state service for at least one year; and provided further that the employee makes arrangements to pay into the retirement system on or before the date of retirement and in such manner as the retirement board may prescribe an amount equal to the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

based upon his or her expected compensation but for the granting of leave without pay.

Any state employee who is granted a leave of absence without pay for illness, injury, or any other reason may receive credit therefor by making the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

; provided the employee returns to state service for at least one year upon completion of the leave. Credit for leaves of absence shall be limited in the aggregate during the total service of an employee to a period of four (4) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

36-9-25.1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 95, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 139, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 174, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 368, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 139, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-26.
Credits for layoffs.

Members who are laid off for any reason and are not on leave without pay may purchase up to one years’ credit for retirement purposes; provided the member did not withdraw his or her retirement contributions while on layoff, and returns to active membership; provided, further, that the member purchases that credit upon his or her return to service from the layoff and pays into the retirement system the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

.

The retirement board shall fix and determine rules and regulations to govern the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 520, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 8; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-27

; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 1.

36-9-28.
Service creditable on retirement.

At retirement, the total service credited a member shall consist of the service rendered by him or her as an employee during his or her membership, and also, if he or she has a prior service certificate which is in full force and effect, the service as an employee certified on his or her prior service certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2334, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 18, § 8; P.L. 1947, ch. 1971, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

36-9-28

.

36-9-29, 36-9-30.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §§

36-9-29

, 36-9-30; P.L. 1961, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1963, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1966, ch. 282, art. 4, § 12; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 1 and P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 3.

36-9-31.
Armed service credit.

Any active member of the retirement system, who served on active duty in the armed service of the United States or in the Merchant Marine service of the United States as defined in P.L. 1946, ch. 1721, § 2 may purchase credit for that service up to a maximum of four (4) years provided that he or she has received an honorable discharge. Provided further that any employee on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall be eligible to purchase military credits as defined herein while on the leave of absence.

The cost to purchase these credits shall be ten percent (10%) of the member’s first year’s earnings as a state employee as defined in chapter 9 of this title, multiplied by the number of years and fraction thereof of the armed service or Merchant Marine service up to a maximum of four (4) years.

There will be no interest charge provided the member makes that purchase during his or her first five (5) years of membership in the retirement system, but will be charged regular interest to date of purchase from date of enrollment into membership if purchased after completing five (5) years of membership; provided, however, any member who was in the retirement system prior to July 1, 1980, would not be charged interest whenever he or she purchases the armed services credit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 173, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 344, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 21, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 242, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 425, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 463, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 510, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 4; P.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 2.

36-9-31.1.
Peace corps, teacher corps, and volunteers in service to America.

Any active member who served in the peace corps, teacher corps, or in volunteers in service to America may purchase credit for that service up to a maximum of four (4) years in the aggregate; provided, that any member on an official leave of absence for illness or injury shall be eligible to purchase those credits while on the leave of absence.

The cost to purchase these credits shall be the full actuarial cost as defined in §

36-8-1(10)

of that service in the peace corps, teacher corps, or VISTA, up to a maximum of four (4) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 423, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 473, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 363, § 29; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 6; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 6.

36-9-31.2 — 36-9-35.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 129, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 284, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 613, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 615, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 477, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 516, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1988, ch. 486, § 1; and 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 3.

36-9-36.
Narragansett Bay water quality management commission — Merger — New employees.

In the event that the Narragansett Bay water quality management commission, hereinafter referred to as “commission”, shall acquire a sewage treatment facility, hereinafter referred to as “facility”, of any city, town, or district, or in the event of the merger or consolidation of a facility into or with the commission, then any employee of the facility who subsequently becomes and remains an employee of the commission who is a collectively bargained employee (within the meaning of § 410(b)(3)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code [26 U.S.C. § 410(b)(3)(A)]) may elect to be treated as a transferred employee pursuant to §

36-9-44

and shall be granted service credits for his or her term of service with the facility prior to the transfer, provided:

An actuarial study is made to determine the cost to include each new member of the system; and

The contributions of both the employer and employee made prior to the transfer are paid to the state employees’ retirement fund.

If the employee elects not to have his or her funds transferred then that employee shall not receive credit for any prior service.

Each employee shall have six (6) months from the time he or she becomes an employee of the commission to decide whether or not the employee wishes to have their funds transferred and receive credit for their prior service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 108, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 225, § 4.

36-9-37.
Purchase of credit while serving a prison sentence — Prohibited.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the retirement law or rulings of the retirement board in accordance with the powers vested to the board, no member of the retirement system shall be allowed to purchase service credits for time while incarcerated in prison, including, but not limited to, work release programs or home confinement programs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 5.

36-9-38.
Purchase of credits for continuous state service.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the retirement laws of this state, any active member of the employees’ retirement system who was 60 years of age or greater when his or her employment commenced, and commenced employment before June 22, 1989, and was ineligible by state law from joining the retirement system shall be allowed to purchase service credits for actual past employment. The number of years for which credits may be purchased shall be limited to the difference between the date upon which they commenced employment at 60 years of age or greater and June 22, 1989, when they were required by law to join the retirement system. Purchase of the past service credits shall be at the rate that contributions would have been calculated at the time of past service, plus interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 231, § 1.

36-9-39.
Rhode Island airport corporation — Transferred employees.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section:

“Airport corporation” means the Rhode Island airport corporation, a governmental agency and public instrumentality of the state of Rhode Island.

“Employee contribution accumulation” means an amount equal to the total member contributions of the transferred employees which were picked up and paid by the airport corporation to the trust maintained by the airport corporation to receive those contributions during the interim period plus actual earnings on the contributions. The employee contribution accumulation attributable to each transferred employee shall be treated as such employee’s accumulated contributions for purposes of chapters 9 and 10 of this title.

“Employer contribution accumulation” means an amount equal to the required contributions applicable to the interim period.

“Interim period” means the period from the transfer date to the date that the requirement of subsection (c) is satisfied.

“Required contribution” means the amount or amounts required to be contributed to the retirement system by the airport corporation in addition to the member contributions of the transferred employees in order to fund the benefits attributable to the transferred employees earned after the transfer date in accordance with the provisions of this section. The amount of the airport corporation’s required contribution for any relevant period following the transfer date shall be an amount determined by multiplying the rate percent established in accordance with §

36-10-2

for the period by the compensation paid by the airport corporation to the transferred employees during the period. The airport corporation shall make its required contribution, other than the required contribution for the interim period, in bi-weekly installments, each to be made within three (3) business days following the pay day. The required contribution applicable to the interim period shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this chapter.

“Transfer date” means July 1, 1993.

“Transferred employee” means any individual who was an employee of the department of transportation of the state of Rhode Island on the date immediately preceding the transfer date, and was an active member of the retirement system on the date immediately preceding the transfer date, and who became an employee of the airport corporation on the transfer date.

Subject to subsections (c), (d) and (e) of this section, the period of service of any transferred employee with the airport corporation after the transfer date shall be treated as service as an employee of the state of Rhode Island for purposes of Chapters 8, 9, and 10 of this title.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply unless within ninety (90) days following the date of enactment of this section, the airport corporation transfers, or causes to have transferred from a trustee or other custodian, to the retirement system, an amount equal to the sum of the employees contribution accumulation and the employer contribution accumulation.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, any individual who is a transferred employee shall not be considered an employee of the state of Rhode Island under subsection (b) for any period of employment in a category of employment making him or her eligible for any other retirement income benefit funded by the airport corporation under a retirement plan sponsored by the airport corporation and intended to qualify under § 401(a)(4), 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(4), of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

Provided the requirement of subsection (c) of this section is satisfied:

Any retirement or death benefit provided to or on behalf of a transferred employee during the interim period by the airport corporation, or a trust established and maintained by the airport corporation, shall be considered provided by the state of Rhode Island retirement system and the amount of benefit paid by the airport corporation, or the trustee, shall reduce the amount required to be transferred to the retirement system under subsection (c) of this section.

Subsection (b) shall continue to apply after the date of transfer specified in subsection (c) with respect to the period for which the airport corporation thereafter makes its required contribution to the retirement system. In the event that the airport corporation ceases to make its required contribution, the transferred employees shall be considered inactive members of the retirement system as of the date of cessation.

The member contributions of the transferred employees shall be considered picked up and paid by the airport corporation to the retirement system after the interim period pursuant to the provisions of § 414(h)(2), 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2), of the United States Internal Revenue Code. The contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining the tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and shall not be included as gross income of the transferred employee until such time as they are distributed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 95, § 1.

36-9-40.
Rhode Island airport corporation — Transferred employees — Bumping rights.

In the event of an adverse employer initiated action by the Rhode Island airport corporation, transferred employees shall be entitled to exercise their bumping rights within the corporation to bump within other bargaining units within Council 94. An adverse employer initiated action is defined as a layoff, job abolishment, privatization, or subcontract of functions within the airport system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 95, § 1.

36-9-41.
Rhode Island airport corporation — Uninterrupted state service.

Transferred employees who return to employment with the state of Rhode Island directly from uninterrupted employment with the Rhode Island airport corporation shall have their length of service at the Rhode Island airport corporation deemed to be uninterrupted active state service for purposes of service credits in the state retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 95, § 1.

36-9-42.
Rhode Island economic development corporation — Transferred employees.

Definitions. For the purposes of this section:

“Economic development corporation” means the Rhode Island economic development corporation, a governmental agency and public instrumentality of the state of Rhode Island.

“Employee contribution accumulation” means an amount equal to the total member contributions of the transferred employees which were picked up and paid by the economic development corporation to the trust maintained by the economic development corporation to receive the contributions during the interim period plus actual earnings on those contributions. The employee contribution accumulation attributable to each transferred employee shall be treated as the employee’s accumulated contributions for purposes of chapter 9 and 10 of this title.

“Employer contribution accumulation” means an amount equal to the required contributions applicable to the interim period.

“Interim period” means the period from the transfer date to the date that the requirement of subsection (c) is satisfied.

“Required contribution” means the amount or amounts required to be contributed to the retirement system by the economic development corporation in addition to the member contributions of the transferred employees in order to fund the benefits attributable to the transferred employees earned after the transfer date in accordance with the provisions of this section. The amount of the economic development corporation’s required contribution for any relevant period following the transfer date shall be an amount determined by multiplying the rate percent established in accordance with §

36-10-2

for the period by the compensation paid by the economic development corporation to the transferred employees during such period. The economic development corporation shall make its required contribution, other than the required contribution for the interim period, in bi-weekly installments, each to be made within three (3) business days following the pay day. The required contribution applicable to the interim period shall be made in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.

“Transfer date” means the effective date of this article.

“Transferred employee” means any individual who was an employee of the department of economic development of the state of Rhode Island on the date immediately preceding the transfer date and was an active member of the retirement system on the date immediately preceding the transfer date and who became an employee of the economic development corporation on the transfer date.

Subject to subsections (c), (d), and (e) of this section, the period of service of any transferred employee with the economic development corporation after the transfer date shall be treated as service as an employee of the state of Rhode Island for purposes of Chapters 8, 9, and 10 of this title.

The provisions of subsection (b) of this section shall not apply unless within ninety (90) days following the date of enactment of this section, the economic development corporation transfers or causes to have transferred from a trustee or other custodian to the retirement system, an amount equal to the sum of the employee contribution accumulation and the employer contribution accumulation.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, any individual who is a transferred employee shall not be considered an employee of the state of Rhode Island under subsection (b) for any period of employment during which he or she elects to participate in any other retirement income benefit funded by the economic development corporation under a retirement plan sponsored by the economic development corporation and intended to qualify under § 401(a)(4), 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(4), of the United States Internal Revenue Code.

Provided the requirement of subsection (c) of this section is satisfied:

Any retirement or death benefit provided to or on behalf of a transferred employee during the interim period by the economic development corporation, or a trust established and maintained by the economic corporation shall be considered provided by the retirement system and the amount of benefit paid by the economic development corporation or the trustee shall reduce the amount required to be transferred to the retirement system under subsection (c) of this section.

Subsection (b) shall continue to apply after the date of transfer specified in subsection (c) with respect to the period for which the economic development corporation thereafter makes its required contribution to the retirement system. In the event that the economic development corporation ceases to make its required contribution, the transferred employees shall be considered inactive members of the retirement system as of the date of cessation.

The member contributions of the transferred employees shall be considered picked up and paid by the economic development corporation to the retirement system after the interim period pursuant to the provisions of § 414(h)(2), 26 U.S.C. 414(H)(2), of the United States Internal Revenue Code. The contributions so picked up shall be treated as employer contributions in determining the tax treatment under the United States Internal Revenue Code and shall not be included as gross income of the transferred employee until such time as they are distributed.

All transferred employees who are contributing members of the employees retirement system shall continue as members unless they elect to cease contributions as of October 31, 1995. Any transferred employee who has contributed for at least ten (10) years may elect to participate in an alternative retirement program and still maintain vested rights to a pension within the employees retirement system. All transferred employees shall have ninety (90) days to make their election to participate in an alternative retirement program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 12, § 25.

36-9-43.
Rhode Island economic development corporation — Uninterrupted state service.

Transferred employees, as defined in §

36-9-42

, who return to employment with the state of Rhode Island directly from uninterrupted employment with the Rhode Island economic development corporation shall have their length of service at the Rhode Island economic development corporation deemed to be uninterrupted active state service for purposes of service credits in the retirement system.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 12, § 25.